apertium-tat.tat.lexc
LEXICON ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION

%+сыз%<post%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON LI-POSTPOSITION

%+лы%<post%>:%>л%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PLURAL

%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSIVES ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;

LEXICON FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION

PLURAL ;
CASES-ETC ;
POSSESSIVES ;
ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;
LI-POSTPOSITION ;

!==============================================================================!
!                 ADJECTIVE'S (ADJECTIVIAL) INFLECTION
!
! FIXME: this section might need some refactoring
!! e.g. change <adj><comp><subst> to <adj><subst><comp>
!! and make use of COMPARATIVE continuation class
!==============================================================================!

!LEXICON COMPARATIVE
!
!%<comp%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON A1                ! adjectives that can be both substantivized and andverbialized;
                          ! all three readings (<adj>, <adj.subst> and <adj.advl>) have comparison levels.
                          !# яхшы, тиз

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;                        !# яхшы кеше
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;   !# яхшырак эш

%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;                             !# "Яхшы яхшыны тудыра."
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;        !# яхшыракны таптым

%<adj%>%<advl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;                               !# "Тиз янган тиз сүнгән."
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<advl%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;          !# "Бәла бәхеттән тизрәк йөри."

LEXICON A2                 ! adjectives without adverbial reading;
                           ! <adj> and <adj.subst> readings have comparison levels.
                           !# иске

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;                        !# иске дус
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;   !# искерәк версия

%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;                             !# "Яңа булды дип, искене ташлама."
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;        !# "Ихтимал, бу бина башкасы, искерәге урынында утырадыр."

LEXICON A3                 ! adjectives without adverbial reading & so-called "predicatives" (бар, юк);
                           ! no comparison levels at all.
                           !# язгы, яшьлек, бар, юк

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;                     !# язгы кыр эшләре
%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;                             !# "Ул 14-25 яшьлекләргә бирелә."
                                                      !# "Хатыны юкның якыны юк." !# "Эше барның ашы бар."

! FIXME:NOTE:loc.attr/subst form of some of them seems to be overgeneration:
! e.g. *язгыдагы

LEXICON A4                 ! "pure" adjectives - no adverbial and substantive readings, no comparison levels;
                           !# милли

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;                     !# милли музей

LEXICON V-ADJ

# ;
%<subst%>: GER-INFL ; ! Dont't be confused by the name of the cont.class,
                      ! it's basically just a simplified N-INFL-COMMON





!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     VERBAL INFLECTION

LEXICON V-PERS-S1-NO1PERSON

%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S1          ! Тулы төрләнеш

! Used for: -IR/AR-<fut>, copula

V-PERS-S1-NO1PERSON ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S1-COP

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S2          ! Кыска төрләнеш

! Used for: -DI-<ifi>, -sA-<prc_cond>, -sA-<gna_cond>

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>к CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>г%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! FIXME %{L%} shouldn't be neccessery here,
                                  ! change it to 'л'

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>г%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>г%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-PRESENT

! As the name indicates, used for -{E}-<pres>

V-PERS-S1-NO1PERSON ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-VOLITIONAL

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>г%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%>%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>г%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>г%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

!!!!!!!   G E R U N D S   I N F L E C T I O N

! This is a somewhat simplified version of N-INFL-COMMON.
! The idea was to avoid overgeneration (I don't think that ger+DAGI would take
! case endings e.g. Same for ger+NIKI). Still, this cont.class might be not
! suitable for all of the gerunds. /IS/

! FIXME: duplicated code here. GER-CASE-NO_COPULA, for instance, is the same thing as "CasesWithoutCopulas" cont.class

LEXICON GER-CASE-NO_COPULA

CASES-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON GER-ATTR-SUBST

%<attr%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!%<subst%>: CASE ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST

!%<attr%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<advl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!%<subst%>: CASE-2 ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE-2 ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ETC          ! Stuff which doesn't appear after possessives

%+сыз%<post%>:%>с%{I%}з GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST ;

LEXICON GER-GENPOSS-ETC      ! Stuff which can appear after possessives too

%<px%>:%>н%{I%}к%{I%}%{n%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} GER-ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON GER-CASE-ETC

GER-CASE-NO_COPULA ;
GER-GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-POSS-REAL-COMMON

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;

%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER_FUT3-POSS-REAL

GER-POSS-REAL-COMMON ;
%<px3sp%>: GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-POSS-REAL

GER-POSS-REAL-COMMON ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-INFL

GER-POSS-REAL ;
GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р GER-POSS-REAL ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р GER-CASE-ETC ;
GER-ABE-ETC ;

!!!!!!!   end of gerunds inflection lexicon

LEXICON V-FUT-IR

%<fut%>:%>%{I%}р V-PERS-S1 ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>м%{A%}с V-PERS-S1-NO1PERSON ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}%>м CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}с%>м%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{A%}%>м%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;  ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<fut%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>м%{A%}%>б%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{I%}р V-ADJ ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_fut%>:%>м%{A%}с V-ADJ ;

%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{I%}рл%{I%}к # ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_ppot%>:%>м%{A%}сл%{I%}к # ;

%<ger_fut%>:%>%{I%}р GER-POSS-REAL ;
%<neg%>%<ger_fut%>:%>м%{A%}с GER-POSS-REAL ;

%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{I%}рл%{I%}к GER-POSS-REAL ;
%<neg%>%<ger_ppot%>:%>м%{A%}сл%{I%}к GER-POSS-REAL ;

%<inf%>:%>%{I%}рг%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<neg%>%<inf%>:%>м%{A%}ск%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

 LEXICON Nouns
мәгълүм:мәгълүм A3 ; ! "" Use/MT
мәзкүр:мәзкүр A3 ; ! ""
мәсмүг:мәсмүг A3 ; ! "" Use/MT
потомственный:потомственный A4 ; ! ""
сумлык:сумлык A3 ; ! "" Use/MT
хөсне:хөсне A4 ; ! ""
ярымлык:ярымлык A3 ; ! "" Use/MT
мактүл:мактүл A3 ; ! "" Use/MT
һәфтәлек:һәфтәлек A3 ; ! ""
вафат:вафат A3 ; ! ""
 LEXICON Adjectives
исраилле:израильле A4 ; ! "" Dir/LR
аерылгысыз:аерылгысыз A4 ; ! "" FIXME  POS (adj&adv, but no comparative level)
аналитик:аналитик%{☭%} A4 ; ! ""
археологик:археологик%{☭%} A4 ; ! ""
ахыргы:ахыргы A4 ; ! ""
бөтендөнья:бөтендөнья%{☭%} A4 ; ! ""
вульгар:вульгар A2 ; ! ""
гасырлык:гасырлык A4 ; ! ""
геохимик:геохимик%{☭%} A4 ; ! ""
горизонталь:горизонталь A4 ; ! ""
демографик:демографик%{☭%} A4 ; ! ""
доминант:доминант A4 ; ! ""
икътисади:икътисади%{ъ%} A4 ; ! ""
интеллектуаль:интеллектуаль A4 ; ! ""
йөгерек:йөгерек A4 ; ! ""
климатик:климатик%{☭%} A4 ; ! ""
корпоратив:корпоратив%{☭%} A4 ; ! ""
күрсәтмә:күрсәтмә A4 ; ! ""
лирик:лирик%{☭%} A4 ; ! ""
мемориаль:мемориаль A4 ; ! ""
минераль:минераль A4 ; ! ""
мөгезле:мөгезле A4 ; ! ""
оптик:оптик%{☭%} A4 ; ! ""
периодик:периодик%{☭%} A4 ; ! ""
пропорциональ:пропорциональ A4 ; ! ""
раиацион:раиацион A4 ; ! ""
сайланма:сайланма A4 ; ! ""
спектраль:спектраль A4 ; ! ""
субъектив:субъектив%{☭%} A4 ; ! ""
теоретик:теоретик%{☭%} A4 ; ! ""
тәрбияви:тәрбияви A4 ; ! ""
тропик:тропик%{☭%} A4 ; ! ""
феодаль:феодаль A4 ; ! ""
чиксез:чиксез A4 ; ! ""
эстетик:эстетик%{☭%} A4 ; ! ""
алдынгы:алдынгы A3 ; ! ""
асыл:асыл A3 ; ! ""
ачулы:ачулы A3 ; ! ""
башлангыч:башлангыч A3 ; ! "~initial"
берек:берек A3 ; ! ""
бәйләнешле:бәйләнешле A3 ; ! ""
еллык:еллык A3 ; ! "-летний,годовой,годичный"
әлеге:әлеге A3 ; ! "" FIXME CHECK
кәбисә:кәбисә A3 ; ! ""
куш:куш A3 ; ! ""
күчмә:күчмә A3 ; ! ""
өстәмә:өстәмә A3 ; ! ""
рухани:рухани%{ъ%} A3 ; ! ""
тиеш:тиеш A3 ; ! ""
тоташ:тоташ A3 ; ! ""
традицион:традицион A3 ; ! ""
туган:туган A3 ; ! "родной"
турындагы:турындагы A3 ; ! ""
федераль:федераль A3 ; ! ""
хәрам:хәрам A3 ; ! ""
хур:хур A3 ; ! ""
чиктәш:чиктәш A3 ; ! ""
шәхси:шәхси A3 ; ! ""
эчке:эчке A3 ; ! "internal"
ябык:ябык A3 ; ! "closed"
яшьлек:яшьлек A3 ; ! "after numerals: of ageX"
аксыл:аксыл A2 ; ! ""
аулак:аулак A2 ; ! ""
ачы:ачы A2 ; ! ""
башлы:башлы A2 ; ! ""
бәяле:бәяле A2 ; ! ""
бөдрә:бөдрә A2 ; ! ""
гаепле:гаепле A2 ; ! ""
деңгелдек:деңгелдек A2 ; ! ""
әһәмиятсез:әһәмиятсез A2 ; ! ""
инсафлы:инсафлы A2 ; ! ""
канлы:канлы A2 ; ! ""
катлаулы:катлаулы A2 ; ! ""
кодрәтле:кодрәтле A2 ; ! ""
кызгылт:кызгылт A2 ; ! ""
кыргый:кыргый A2 ; ! ""
майлы:майлы A2 ; ! ""
нәни:нәни A2 ; ! ""
нык:нык A2 ; ! ""
өметле:өметле A2 ; ! ""
сазламык:сазламык A2 ; ! ""
тантаналы:тантаналы A2 ; ! ""
тәкъва:тәкъва A2 ; ! ""
тозлаклы:тозлаклы A2 ; ! ""
төсле:төсле A2 ; ! ""
түгәрәк:түгәрәк A2 ; ! "round, circular"
үзсүзле:үзсүзле A2 ; ! ""
чыдам:чыдам A2 ; ! ""
юеш:юеш A2 ; ! ""
авыру:авыру A2 ; ! ""
азаккы:азаккы A3 ; ! ""
актыккы:актыккы A1 ; ! ""
акылсыз:акылсыз A2 ; ! ""
аллы%-гөлле:аллы%-гөлле A2 ; ! ""
антиматериалистик:антиматериалистик%{☭%} A1 ; ! ""
ары% табангы:ары% табангы A3 ; ! ""
арык:арык A2 ; ! ""
афористик:афористик%{☭%} A1 ; ! ""
әхлаклы:әхлаклы A1 ; ! ""
әшәке:әшәке A2 ; ! ""
бәсле:бәсле A1 ; ! ""
бердәнбер:бердәнбер A3 ; ! ""
бичара:бичара A2 ; ! ""
бөтен:бөтен A2 ; ! ""
буй%-буй:буй%-буй A1 ; ! ""
ватандашлык:ватандашлык A4 ; ! ""
гаҗәп:гаҗәп A1 ; ! ""
гомуми:гомуми A2 ; ! ""
дәрәҗәле:дәрәҗәле A1 ; ! ""
дымлы:дымлы A2 ; ! ""
җәһәт:җәһәт A1 ; ! ""
җирән:җирән A2 ; ! ""
җирле:җирле A3 ; ! ""
иҗтимагый:иҗтимагый A3 ; ! ""
икенчел:икенчел A1 ; ! ""
иңле:иңле A2 ; ! ""
ишетелмәгән:ишетелмәгән A1 ; ! ""
килбәтле:килбәтле A1 ; ! ""
куәтле:куәтле A1 ; ! ""
кысык:кысык A1 ; ! ""
миллиончы:миллиончы A1 ; ! ""
олпат:олпат A1 ; ! ""
рәтле:рәтле A1 ; ! ""
синхрон:синхрон A1 ; ! ""
талашлы:талашлы A1 ; ! ""
томанлы:томанлы A1 ; ! ""
тын:тын A1 ; ! ""
үпкәчел:үпкәчел A1 ; ! ""
хокукый:хокукый A1 ; ! ""
шәмәхә:шәмәхә A1 ; ! ""
эчкәре:эчкәре A1 ; ! ""
аналык:аналык A1 ; ! ""
куп%-куе:куп%-куе A4 ; ! ""
кып%-кыска:кып%-кыска A4 ; ! ""
куе:куе A1 ; ! ""
көндезге:көндезге A1 ; ! ""
европалы:европалы A1 ; ! ""
кисү:кисү A1 ; ! ""
героик:героик%{☭%} A1 ; ! ""
әчкелт:әчкелт A1 ; ! ""
түләүле:түләүле A1 ; ! ""
санлы:санлы A1 ; ! ""
йоморо:йоморо A1 ; ! ""
алмашлап:алмашлап A1 ; ! ""
бушка:бушка A1 ; ! ""
йокылы:йокылы A1 ; ! ""
белемле:белемле A1 ; ! ""
кәрәз:кәрәз A1 ; ! ""
